src/dictionaries/lv_LV.aff
#iebâzti III konjugâcijas am (tipa [^âçî]t
SFX ( Y 184
SFX (   t   ams      [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   ama      [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amâ      [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amai     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amais    [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajâ    [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajai   [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajam   [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajâm   [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajâs   [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajiem  [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajos   [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amam     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amâm     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amas     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amâs     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   ami      [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amie     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amiem    [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amo      [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amos     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amu      [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amus     [^âçî]t
SFX (   ît   âms     [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âma     [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmam    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmu     [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmâ     [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmas    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmai    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmi     [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmiem   [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmus    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmos    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmâm    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmâs    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmais   [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajam  [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmo     [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajâ   [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajai  [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmie    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajiem [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajos  [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajâm  [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajâs  [^cz][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâms     [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâma     [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmam    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmu     [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmâ     [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmas    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmai    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmi     [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmiem   [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmus    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmos    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmâm    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmâs    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmais   [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajam  [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmo     [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajâ   [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajai  [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmie    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajiem [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajos  [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajâm  [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajâs  [c][î]t
SFX (   ît   âms     [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âma     [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmam    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmu     [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmâ     [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmas    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmai    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmi     [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmiem   [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmus    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmos    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmâm    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmâs    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmais   [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajam  [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmo     [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajâ   [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajai  [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmie    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajiem [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajos  [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajâm  [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajâs  [^d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâms     [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâma     [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmam    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmu     [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmâ     [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmas    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmai    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmi     [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmiem   [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmus    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmos    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmâm    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmâs    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmais   [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajam  [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmo     [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajâ   [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajai  [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmie    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajiem [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajos  [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajâm  [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajâs  [d]zît
SFX (   çt   ams      [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   ama      [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amâ      [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amai     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amais    [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajâ    [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajai   [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajam   [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajâm   [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajâs   [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajiem  [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajos   [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amam     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amâm     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amas     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amâs     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   ami      [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amie     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amiem    [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amo      [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amos     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amu      [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amus     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tams    [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tama      [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamâ      [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamai     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamais    [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajâ    [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajai   [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajam   [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajâm   [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajâs   [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajiem  [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajos   [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamam     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamâm     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamas     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamâs     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tami      [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamie     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamiem    [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamo      [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamos     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamu      [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamus     [t][ç]t
SFX (   t   ms      [â]t
SFX (   t   ma      [â]t
SFX (   t   mam     [â]t
SFX (   t   mu      [â]t
SFX (   t   mâ      [â]t
SFX (   t   mas     [â]t
SFX (   t   mai     [â]t
SFX (   t   mi      [â]t
SFX (   t   miem    [â]t
SFX (   t   mus     [â]t
SFX (   t   mos     [â]t
SFX (   t   mâm     [â]t
SFX (   t   mâs     [â]t
SFX (   t   mais    [â]t
SFX (   t   majam   [â]t
SFX (   t   mo      [â]t
SFX (   t   majâ    [â]t
SFX (   t   majai   [â]t
SFX (   t   mie     [â]t
SFX (   t   majiem  [â]t
SFX (   t   majos   [â]t
SFX (   t   majâm   [â]t
SFX (   t   majâs   [â]t


SFX ^ Y 23
SFX ^   t   stoğs     t
SFX ^   t   stoğa     t
SFX ^   t   stoğam    t
SFX ^   t   stoğu     t
SFX ^   t   stoğâ     t
SFX ^   t   stoğas    t
SFX ^   t   stoğai    t
SFX ^   t   stoği     t
SFX ^   t   stoğiem   t
SFX ^   t   stoğus    t
SFX ^   t   stoğos    t
SFX ^   t   stoğâm    t
SFX ^   t   stoğâs    t
SFX ^   t   stoğais   t
SFX ^   t   stoğajam  t
SFX ^   t   stoğo     t
SFX ^   t   stoğajâ   t
SFX ^   t   stoğajai  t
SFX ^   t   stoğie    t
SFX ^   t   stoğajiem t
SFX ^   t   stoğajos  t
SFX ^   t   stoğajâm  t
SFX ^   t   stoğajâs  t

SFX $ Y 23
SFX $   t   joğs     t
SFX $   t   joğa     t
SFX $   t   joğam    t
SFX $   t   joğu     t
SFX $   t   joğâ     t
SFX $   t   joğas    t
SFX $   t   joğai    t
SFX $   t   joği     t
SFX $   t   joğiem   t
SFX $   t   joğus    t
SFX $   t   joğos    t
SFX $   t   joğâm    t
SFX $   t   joğâs    t
SFX $   t   joğais   t
SFX $   t   joğajam  t
SFX $   t   joğo     t
SFX $   t   joğajâ   t
SFX $   t   joğajai  t
SFX $   t   joğie    t
SFX $   t   joğajiem t
SFX $   t   joğajos  t
SFX $   t   joğajâm  t
SFX $   t   joğajâs  t
