src/dictionaries/lv_LV.dic
aizdāvināt/(+bdgIBCch1JM[
aizecēt/+IB1)GbdgH{$JM[
aizgūt/Z^aMd+IJ7B4[
aizkļūt/+ZI7BJ^a4M
aizlocīt/+IBMb(hdJg1[
aizlodēt/b${I+MdJgH)BG[1
aizpampt/Z^Ie+B7M4J
aizritināt/+hMb(gcIBJd[1C
aizsijāt/b+G$){IMJ[gHBd1
aizsprāgt/MZ^a+BI74J
aizspīdēt/+JBdh1gIcMC(b
aiztūkt/ZIaB+^7JM4
aizvirpuļot/+Jb)$1IBHM
aizķepināt/c+Idb(1gBhJMC
aizžūt/Ba^7I+4JZM
apairēt/+d[gGbHIBJ)$M1{
apdarināt/+(hIJMBb1C
apdilt/J^4B+eZ7IM
apelēt/$I+)J[b1gBdGHM{
apgrūt/+ZM7BIJ4^a
apgrūtināt/+bcgIB(hCMd1J[
apkaut/+^)I$MJB65
apkravāt/BI+G$dJH[b)g1{M
apkārpīt/b+IB[(hJM1C
apmirt/^eZ+I7BJM4
apmērīt/{HJb)(I+g1B$dCM[G
apmēļot/HbBI+d$)GJg1M
apraustīt/b+1BI(J[CM
apsarkt/I+aB^7Z4MJ
apsijāt/+IBHb)$1MJ
apsmirdēt/b+IJhC(BM1
apstulbt/+Ze^JIB74M
apsēdināt/+bghCcMJ[(BI1d
apsūnot/Bb)+J$HMI1
apvārgt/^+J7Z4BaIM
apvīstīt/IJ+[(B1bMC
apēvelēt/+Gb)JMgH$IdB[1
apņaudēt/+J(bhBI1CM
apžūt/BI+a^J47ZM
atbultēt/+b$)J[gHGBI1dM
atdauzīt/+J(cMhIBb1[gdC
atdēt/^+bJM1
atgrandīt/+bIB(MJ1C
atkaut/+dJ^[M
atkašņāt/b+I{dG$gH)BM1[J
atknubināt/I(Bcd+hCb[JgM1
atmelot/)$gHb+JBIGM1d
atmurmināt/+hgdBbIc(1JCM
atpazīt/+a^ZIB7J4d[M
atrist/+JheFMI(845
atskurbt/eI+ZJ^MB74
atslinkot/+)dBG$bgIJ1HM
atspirdzināt/+b(hMJdgIcB[C1
attirpt/J+Ze^IBM74
attrallināt/Bd1g(I[+hbcJMC
attēlot/b+G$)JBdI1gHM
atzibināt/gb(hBI+c1dMCJ
atčiept/+Z^MJ7
atšalkot/MI+B)H$1bJ
atšļakstināt/hdcBI1(+bgMCJ
bolīt/BI+h(1cgbM[dCJ
brēkāt/+Ib$)HBMJ1
dekorēt/$+)GM{[bJgHBId1
derēt/+hBI(bJMcgCd1[
dublēt/+gb$)1IB{[MJdGH
dzimt/4Be+IZJ^7M
dīdīt/BI(+gJ[d1bcChM
fiksēt/+$BIgb[{)JdHG1M
grebt/+deI)$[JB4M
gurt/^IJ+MB4eZ7
ieaicināt/c+ChJMdgIB(b1
iebrūnēt/1gI+G)J[M$bdBH
iedimdināt/+[hdbCcI(BJ1Mg
iegofrēt/+MI$J)bGgHB[1d
iegumzīt/hb+gc[(1IBJMdC
ieilgt/+^ZJMaI7B4
iekravāt/I+G)1gMBdJ$[Hb{
iekurkšķēt/+(chbIJCBd1gM
iemudžēt/b(h+CBM1IJ
iemēļot/+g)HbBIM$GdJ1
ienirt/+eIB47^ZMJ
iepriecināt/+IJbdMB(hg[cC1
iesarkt/+IZaB^J74M
iesirot/+)$bJBIHGM1
ieslānīt/+g1Id(hcBbJMC
iesvilt/+e7BIJZ^d[M4
iesākt/+a(dBIh4JM8[}
ietamborēt/J+)gH$bdIM1BG[
ievajadzēt/+gMJhbd(I[
iezobot/+bdg)BIHG$M1J
iečiept/^M+ZJ7
ieķircināt/+b(1IBgJhdCcM
interpolēt/[Bb+)$HGgId1{JM
izaugt/+(IhJaBM84
izbirt/^+ZeI7BMJ4
izcūkot/+$b{gIG)1JdB[MH
izdimdēt/+IM1Bh(C[Jb
izgavilēt/+[bBI1)Ggd$HM
izgrūt/+B7IZa4^MJ
izknubināt/g+bJ[Idh(CMcB1
izkontrastēt/J+bG)I$[gMdHB1
izlept/4BIeJ^+M
izmaurot/g)+$bJIB1dMGH
izpilināt/b(c+IBJ[ghCM1d
izprātot/+bHGg)BI$dJM1
izpūt/BI+a^47ZJM
izslimot/b$+)GIBJdgHM1
izslāpt/eI+Z^M7B4J
izsmirdēt/bIB+(hcCJd[gM1
iztransportēt/+I)J1B[b$GMgdH
iztvīkt/+JIZa^B74M
izvaibstīt/[(+cdIbJhB1MgC
izzobot/+bdGgIBHJ$)1M
izļumt/+(eZ^JIhB7M84
izņaudēt/+I1g[hcJ(bdBCM
kariķēt/+Ig{)G$bJdB1[MH
konstruēt/)I+GMdb1gB{J$H[
kult/+IBaJ5d[^M6
kārdināt/(+hcBI[gdCJbM1
laimēt/$Gb)+dIBJ[gH{1M
manevrēt/+b)GI$J{HgBM[d1
mērdēt/1BI+)Hgb$G[dJM{
mīlēt/$+BIh(c)MbHgJ1[Cd
mīt/+BIJ%a^[d4M
nobizot/+gIB1)G$dMbJH
nodokumentēt/$+b)dG[IBJgM1H
nodzirdināt/J+hgIcB(bCdM1
nogleznot/+IbJ$)BGM1H
nogult/^+e7BIhZJ5M[d
nokaut/$+^BIJM)65
noknikšķēt/+BI(Ch[Jb1M
nokvalificēt/[+IgBdJb1)H$GM
nokvēpt/+^eIB74ZJM
nomielot/+I)J$BbHd1GgM
nomīt/BI+a^4JdM
nonest/F[+Ihe(}84JM
noplīvot/$+IH)bGJMB1
noreibt/+Ze^IBJ7M4
norobīt/+Bb)$1IMJH
noskanēt/[b(+IJhMB1C
nospringt/+^ZJaI7B4M
nosprādzēt/[bg+d)B{MH$IJ1G
nosvinēt/[b1BIch+(JgMdC
notiesāt/$+bHIB)J1M
notīt/I+a^B4[dJM
novārguļot/G+bMI1B$)JH
novārīt/hcg+([bBIJC1Md
noļimt/+BeZ^MI7J4
nošķiebt/[+JBIe6$d)4M
nožilbināt/+MdcCbIB(1h[gJ
pabirt/+Z^IB4e7MJ
pabrūnēt/+bdMBIHGg$)J1[
padurt/+^(hIBJ56M
pagūt/BI+Z^a7J4M
paklaušināt/bJBdIc+hg(CM1[
pakoklēt/bG+$gI)BdHM1[J
palīkt/+BaI^Z47MJ
pametināt/I+b(cdBJh[gMC1
papampt/+^ZIB4JeM7
paperēt/+IdBHg$)GbcMJ[1
paripināt/+IdbBcC([JghM1
pasalkt/+^ZaJI7B4M
paslāpt/+e7^ZBJIM4
paspēlēt/$)G+bIM{J1g[dBH
paspīdzināt/C+Icgb[Jdh(M1B
patirpt/+Ze^IJM7B4
patīksmināt/b+[chIdB(g1CJM
pavērpt/$Ie+)B46MJ
pavīt/BI+^7Z[dMJ
paīdēt/+MJbIB1(h[C
pašūt/BI+^[aJ46M
piedraudēt/(+IhbCBJM1
piedzejot/+J$)GBIbH1M
piegrūt/+a^4ZB7IJM
pielīgot/+$gIdJbBHG)1M
pielīkt/+a^JIZMB74
piepilināt/+J[ghb(BI1dcMC
pierakt/I+J^aBd[4M
pieslīgt/a+MJ^ZIB74
piesmaiļot/d1BI+J$b)MHG[
piesūcināt/(+MgcJIB1bhdC[
pietūkt/Z^7+aIJB4M
pieēvelēt/+Bd1g)IJ[M$HbG
plaukt/+JIaMZ^7B4
prasīt/IJ1[+dc(bgM
pāraulekšot/b+)$BI1GJHM
pārglaudīt/I+bh([MJ1
pārgult/MeZ+BId^hJ75[
pārgāzelēt/b+)MIB1$gHGd[J
pārlāpīt/chb+dBI(Jg[1MC
pārlīgt/ZJ^+aM7BI4
pārmedot/d+[GHbIBJ1M)$
pārraut/+$^d)M5IB6J[
pārsauļot/$+J)bIGMB1H
pārskūpstīt/+cbM(I1gBdhJ[C
pārspringt/+ZaJ7BI^4M
pārvaidēt/b+JCcIB1(hgd[M
pārvemt/J[$)d+IB6M
pārvīt/^+dIBZ7M[J
pāržilbt/+^BIe7MZJ4
rasināt/+bI[JB(chCgd1M
remontēt/+G[J${bg)IdHMB1
rimt/Id+ZeMJ[B74^
sadimdēt/B1I+bMh([JC
sadrīvēt/+MBIHb$)J1
sagrimt/+Z^eIBMJ74
saklunkšķināt/+gIcJBdh1(b[CM
sakompromitēt/$+[J)bI1gBdGHM
sakult/+^IaB5J6[M
salīkt/+BaI^Z47MJ
sametināt/+hIbdc([MgCBJ1
sanēsāt/{Hb+$1IBg)[GMJd
sapīkt/^Z+aIB47MJ
sarosināt/BI1(h+cdbg[MCJ
sasirgt/I+aZ^7BJ4M
sasprāgt/a^Z7BI+M4J
saspundēt/+IG$)B1gb[HdMJ
sastāvēt/+gMhIcb[JBd(1C
satupt/+Z^dI(ehJB7M[48
savārīt/+cbdBh([gIJC1M
sazalgot/+IbGB1)$JMH
saķert/M+^dI(6Bh[5J
sažūt/BI^+aMZ7J4
skalināt/+gJ[BdhMI(cCb1
slīkt/+aIB^MZ47J
spulgot/Mg+JdGB$1)Ib{H[
stāstīt/+bcdJBC(gIM1
tilpt/+MeZ^I7B4J
ubagot/H[+$)IGBbgJ{d1M
uzart/4BIe+[hdJ(6M}
uzbārt/+^JM
uzkaisīt/+h(cbgIMdJB1C
uzkniebt/$IJ4B)+6e[M
uzkult/B+MI6J^5a[
uzmurmināt/(1g[I+BbdMCchJ
uzplaukt/Z^+a7MIB4J
uzraudzēt/+Jdb$1gIBG)MH
uzsmirdināt/+bgdcBC(h[IJM1
uzsvilt/+IJe7BZ^4M
uztīkot/+G[b)$IJ1dBMH
uzvalbīt/+hdBbg1I(JcMC
uzķērkt/ZJ+^M%I6a57B
vadīt/BI(+bh[gd1McCJ
verbalizēt/+I$)bJB1MH
čiept/ZM^)+B4I$e7J6
ķept/e+Ih8J(BM4
šķirt/(+hJI^65M[dB
šķīvot/1I$b)dB+GJH[M
